Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 87.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-533
Department of Economic Development; Industrial Recruitment.

AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Program No. 603 - Industrial Recruitment

FY2007-08FY2008-09GENERAL FUND2,872,9892,831,365CASH FUND6,490,1636,490,196FEDERAL FUND est.325,515325,515PROGRAM TOTAL9,688,6679,647,076SALARY LIMIT1,459,0461,487,151

The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2007, is hereby reappropriated.

There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2007-08 $377,500 General Funds, $6,357,944 Cash Funds, and $249,341 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2008-09 $277,500 General Funds, $6,357,944 Cash Funds, and $249,341 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.

Laws 2007, LB321, § 238;

Laws 2008, LB959, § 87;

Laws 2008, LB960, § 188.